Georgia statutes. 
It shall be the duty of the judges of the probate courts of the counties whose dividing line is sought to be changed to lay before the grand juries of their respective counties, on the first day of the next term of the superior courts after the publication of the notice and the filing of the petition provided for in Code Section 36-3-1, the original petition, together with all maps, plats, and other papers that may have been filed therewith. If such grand juries, by a two-thirds' vote of their respective bodies, approve the change applied for, they shall so declare in their general presentments. This action of the grand juries shall be certified at once by the clerks of the superior courts to the county governing authority in the counties to be affected, who shall, within 30 days from the date of the certification, approve or disapprove the application and certify their action to the judges of the probate courts of their respective counties. When the judges of the probate courts have satisfactory evidence of the concurrent approval of the grand juries and of the county governing authority in the counties to be affected, they shall cause an official notice of concurrent approval and a description of the line approved to be published for at least 30 days in a public newspaper having general circulation in their respective counties.

History

(Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 52, § 2; Code 1882, § 508o; Civil Code 1895, § 383; Civil Code 1910, § 469; Code 1933, § 23-302.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Grand juries, T. 15, C. 12, A. 4.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 26 et seq.

36-3-3. When new boundary lines deemed established.

Statute text

When all the proceedings have been had in the manner prescribed in Code Sections 36-3-1 and 36-3-2 and when the same have been fairly recorded by the judges of the probate courts on the minutes of their respective courts, the new line or lines shall be held to have been established in lieu of the original line or lines.

History

(Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 52, § 3; Code 1882, § 508r; Civil Code 1895, § 384; Civil Code 1910, § 470; Code 1933, § 23-303.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Rerecording of deeds, mortgages, or other papers to land affected by change in county boundaries, § 44-2-13.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Sovereign immunity not waived. - In an action arising out of an arrest, despite the way the arrestee was treated, the trial court properly dismissed a complaint against a county, and granted summary judgment on the same complaint against a city, on sovereign immunity grounds and because the arrestee failed to show that the immunity had been waived. Scott v. City of Valdosta, 280 Ga. App. 481, 634 S.E.2d 472 (2006).

36-3-4. Payment of costs of proceedings.

Statute text

The entire costs of advertising and recording the petition, descriptions, and all other papers and proceedings relating to the proposed change in the boundary line of a county shall be paid by the person or persons applying therefor.

History

(Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 52, § 4; Code 1882, § 508s; Civil Code 1895, § 385; Civil Code 1910, § 471; Code 1933, § 23-304; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

36-3-5. Filing of survey, plat, and resolution relating to change of boundary with Secretary of State; disposition thereof; recordation of certified copy by clerks of superior courts.

Statute text

When all proceedings have transpired pursuant to this article, three copies of the survey and plat evidencing a change in county lines and a copy of a resolution from the governing authority of each county evidencing approval of the change shall be filed jointly by the judge of the probate court of each county with the Secretary of State. Upon receipt of the copies of the survey and plat and the resolutions provided above, the Secretary of State shall certify the survey and plat and send a certified copy thereof to the clerk of the superior court of each county affected by the change in county lines. The clerk of the superior court shall record the survey and plat in the same book in which other plats of the county are recorded. The Secretary of State shall retain one copy of the survey and plat, such copy of the survey and plat to be filed in his office.

History

(Code 1933, § 23-305, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 394, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Rerecording of deeds, mortgages, or other papers to land affected by change in county boundaries, § 44-2-13.

——————————

ARTICLE 2

SETTLEMENT OF BOUNDARY DISPUTES

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey on local government law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 135 (2014).

36-3-20. Presentment of boundary dispute by grand jury; certification to Governor; appointment of surveyor to define line; return of survey and plat to Secretary of State.

Statute text

When the boundary line between two or more counties is in dispute and the grand jury of either county presents that the boundary line needs to be marked out and defined, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the superior court in the county where the presentments were made to certify the presentments to the Governor. The Governor shall appoint some suitable and competent land surveyor, who shall not reside in either county, to survey, mark out, and define the boundary line in dispute and to return the survey with plat to the Secretary of State's office to be recorded in a book to be kept for that purpose.

History

(Ga. L. 1887, p. 106, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 386; Civil Code 1910, § 472; Code 1933, § 23-401; Ga. L. 1977, p. 248, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey on local government law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 135 (2014).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

This section and the following section do not contemplate actions between counties, but the statutes devise a process by which the line as originally fixed by the legislature in the formation of the counties shall be ascertained and made certain. Early County v. Baker County, 137 Ga. 126, 72 S.E. 905 (1911).

Availability of mandamus. - Mandamus will issue to compel ordinary (now judge of the probate court) to comply with the Act of 1879. Dickson v. Hill, 75 Ga. 369 (1885).

Mandamus cannot dictate where boundary line to be located. - Trial court erred by granting a county mandamus relief in a county boundary line dispute action pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-3-20 et seq., because while mandamus was authorized to compel the Georgia Secretary of State to do certain tasks, it was not authorized to dictate where the boundary line was to be located. Bibb County v. Monroe County, 294 Ga. 730, 755 S.E.2d 760 (2014).

Line located contrary to prior judgment does not nullify judgment. - When the public authorities in locating line under this and the following sections located the line so that the line included land between lines contended for by parties to the litigation in which a judgment had been rendered, this did not nullify the prior judgment fixing the boundary line between the parties. Caverly v. Stovall, 143 Ga. 705, 85 S.E. 844 (1915).

Cited in Fine v. Dade County, 198 Ga. 655, 32 S.E.2d 246 (1944).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 12 Am. Jur. 2d, Boundaries, § 46 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 26 et seq.

ALR. - Right of political division to challenge acts or proceedings by which its boundaries or limits are affected, 86 A.L.R. 1367.

36-3-21. Service of notice of survey upon county authorities.

Statute text

Before the land surveyor proceeds to make the survey, he shall give the authorities having charge of the revenues of the counties at least ten days' notice of the time and place intended to commence the survey. The notice shall be given by mail or in person.

History

(Ga. L. 1887, p. 106, § 5; Civil Code 1895, § 390; Civil Code 1910, § 479; Code 1933, § 23-402; Ga. L. 1977, p. 248, § 2.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Fine v. Dade County, 198 Ga. 655, 32 S.E.2d 246 (1944).

36-3-21.1. Counties' agreement to boundary lines; filing of resolutions.

Statute text

(a) At any time after certification of the grand jury presentment to the Governor and prior to a final determination by the Secretary of State under Code Section 36-3-24, the governing authorities of the affected counties may by mutual agreement determine where the boundary line shall be located. Any such agreement shall be evidenced by the adoption of an appropriate concurrent unanimous resolution by the governing authority of each affected county; and each such resolution shall incorporate or incorporate by reference an agreed upon plat, description, or other means of definitely ascertaining the boundary line.

(b) The resolutions of the affected counties shall be filed with the Secretary of State and the Department of Community Affairs, together with the agreed upon plat, description, or other means of definitely ascertaining the county line. If the Secretary of State finds that:

(1) Such resolutions meet the requirements of this Code section;

(2) The agreed upon plat, description, or other means adequately defines the boundary line;

(3) The surveyor, if appointed, has been adequately compensated for services performed to date or adequate arrangements have been made for the payment of such compensation; and

(4) The agreement is otherwise proper to terminate the boundary dispute,

then the Secretary of State may enter a written determination that the disputed boundary line has been determined by agreement as authorized by this Code section. Such written determination, the concurrent resolutions of the affected counties, and the plat, description or other means of definitely ascertaining the boundary line shall be recorded in the same manner and with the same effect provided for in Code Section 36-3-25.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-3-21.1, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1292, § 1.)

36-3-22. Copy of survey and plat furnished to county authorities.

Statute text

The land surveyor appointed by the Governor to survey, mark out, and define the boundary line in dispute shall furnish the judges of the probate courts or chairmen of the boards of county commissioners of the respective counties with a copy of the survey and plat made and returned by him to the Secretary of State, at the same time the survey and plat are made and returned to the Secretary of State.

History

(Ga. L. 1899, p. 24, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 473; Code 1933, § 23-403; Ga. L. 1977, p. 248, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - Former Civil Code 1910, §§ 473-475 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-3-22 - 36-3-24) were not violative of Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XXIII (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. III) as an attempt to confer judicial power upon the Secretary of State. Early County v. Baker County, 137 Ga. 126, 72 S.E. 905 (1911), aff'd, 10 Ga. App. 305, 73 S.E. 352 (1912).

Cited in Fine v. Dade County, 198 Ga. 655, 32 S.E.2d 246 (1944).

36-3-23. Filing of survey and plat with Secretary of State; time for protest or exceptions thereto.

Statute text

The survey with plat, made and returned to the Secretary of State, shall be filed in his office, and entry of filing shall be made thereon; but the survey and plat shall not be recorded within the space of 30 days from the date of its reception in such office, for the purpose of allowing the authorities of either county dissatisfied therewith to file a protest or exceptions thereto within that time.

History

(Ga. L. 1899, p. 24, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 474; Code 1933, § 23-404.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - Former Civil Code 1910, §§ 473-475 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-3-22 - 36-3-24) were not violative of Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XXIII (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. III) as an attempt to confer judicial power upon the Secretary of State. Early County v. Baker County, 137 Ga. 126, 72 S.E. 905 (1911), , 10 Ga. App. 305, 73 S.E. 352 (1912).

Mandamus cannot dictate where boundary line to be located. - Trial court erred by granting a county mandamus relief in a county boundary line dispute action pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-3-20 et seq., because while mandamus was authorized to compel the Georgia Secretary of State to do certain tasks, it was not authorized to dictate where the boundary line was to be located. Bibb County v. Monroe County, 294 Ga. 730, 755 S.E.2d 760 (2014).

Cited in Fine v. Dade County, 198 Ga. 655, 32 S.E.2d 246 (1944).

36-3-24. Notice and hearing of protest or exceptions by Secretary of State.

Statute text

If a protest or exceptions to the survey and plat are filed in the Secretary of State's office within the 30 days, it shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to give, through the mail, ten days' written notice of the time when he will hear the protest or exceptions at his office to the county governing authorities of the respective counties. Upon the hearing, the Secretary of State shall determine from the law and evidence the true boundary line in dispute between the respective counties.

History

(Ga. L. 1899, p. 24, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 475; Code 1933, § 23-405.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - Former Civil Code 1910, §§ 473-475 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-3-22 - 36-3-24) were not violative of Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. I, Para XXIII (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. III) as an attempt to confer judicial power upon the Secretary of State. Early County v. Baker County, 137 Ga. 126, 72 S.E. 905 (1911), , 10 Ga. App. 305, 73 S.E. 352 (1912).

Secretary has discretion in conducting hearing. - On remand of a county boundary dispute under O.C.G.A. § 36-3-20 et seq., a trial court erred by proscribing the Secretary of State from holding a new hearing or considering additional evidence before determining the boundary between two counties; O.C.G.A. § 36-3-24 gave the Secretary broad discretion in making the Secretary's determination. Kemp v. Monroe County, 298 Ga. 67, 779 S.E.2d 330 (2015).

Mandamus cannot dictate where boundary line to be located. - Trial court erred by granting a county mandamus relief in a county boundary line dispute action pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-3-20 et seq., because while mandamus was authorized to compel the Georgia Secretary of State to do certain tasks, it was not authorized to dictate where the boundary line was to be located. Bibb County v. Monroe County, 294 Ga. 730, 755 S.E.2d 760 (2014).

Secretary's authority to subpoena. - Trial court did not err by entering a declaratory judgment ordering the land surveyor to comply with the subpoena issued as the Secretary of State had the authority to require the surveyor to appear as a witness at a final hearing on a county boundary-line dispute. Scarborough v. Kemp, 348 Ga. App. 79, 819 S.E.2d 710 (2018), cert. denied, 2019 Ga. LEXIS 535 (Ga. 2019).

Cited in Fine v. Dade County, 198 Ga. 655, 32 S.E.2d 246 (1944).

36-3-25. Recordation of survey and plat; conclusive effect; subsequent changes of boundary line.

Statute text

Upon the making of a decision by the Secretary of State pursuant to Code Section 36-3-24 or in case no protest or exceptions are filed within the 30 days, the Secretary of State shall cause the survey and plat to be recorded in a book to be kept for that purpose, whereupon the same shall be final and conclusive as to the boundary line in dispute. When the boundary line in dispute has been established as final and conclusive as provided in this Code section, the same boundary line shall not again be subject to the procedures set forth in this article, and such boundary line may subsequently be changed only in accordance with Article 1 of this chapter, provided that nothing contained in this sentence shall affect any boundary line dispute in question on July 1, 1980, until the dispute is settled.

History

(Ga. L. 1899, p. 24, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 476; Code 1933, § 23-406; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1178, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1980, p. 1178, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that nothing in that Act, which added the last two sentences to this Code section, shall affect any boundary line disputes already in question, until such disputes are settled.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Mandamus cannot dictate where boundary line to be located. - Trial court erred by granting a county mandamus relief in a county boundary line dispute action pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-3-20 et seq., because while mandamus was authorized to compel the Georgia Secretary of State to do certain tasks, it was not authorized to dictate where the boundary line was to be located. Bibb County v. Monroe County, 294 Ga. 730, 755 S.E.2d 760 (2014).

Secretary has discretion in conducting hearing. - On remand of a county boundary dispute under O.C.G.A. § 36-3-20 et seq., a trial court erred by proscribing the Secretary of State from holding a new hearing or considering additional evidence before determining the boundary between two counties; O.C.G.A. § 36-3-24 gave the Secretary broad discretion in making the Secretary's determination. Kemp v. Monroe County, 298 Ga. 67, 779 S.E.2d 330 (2015).

Cited in Fine v. Dade County, 198 Ga. 655, 32 S.E.2d 246 (1944).

36-3-26. Compensation of land surveyor; notification of county authorities of fee; advisory committee.

Statute text

(a) The land surveyor shall receive a fee to be fixed by the Secretary of State or his designated deputy or assistant. Such fee shall be based upon reasonable compensation for the work to be performed and the rates normally charged by land surveyors in the same geographical area as the disputed line. The fee shall be negotiated prior to the commencement of the survey. Prior to the commencement of the survey, it shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to notify the governing authorities of the counties affected of the fee which has been negotiated.

(b) For the purpose of assisting the Secretary of State in connection with his responsibilities and duties to fix and negotiate an appropriate fee for the services of the land surveyor in surveying, marking out, and defining the boundary line in dispute, the Secretary of State may appoint an advisory committee to be composed of three registered land surveyors. One of the members of the advisory committee shall be a county surveyor who shall be selected by the Secretary of State from a list of at least three county surveyors submitted to the Secretary of State by the Association County Commissioners of Georgia. The members of the advisory committee shall serve at the pleasure of the Secretary of State or for such terms as the Secretary of State shall provide. The members of the advisory committee shall receive no compensation for their services as such.

(c) The advisory committee shall review the proposals of the land surveyor appointed by the Governor and shall counsel and advise the Secretary of State as to the committee's recommendation concerning an appropriate fee for such services. The recommendations of the advisory committee to the Secretary of State in relation to such fee shall not be binding upon the Secretary of State but shall be used by the Secretary of State in assisting him in determining and fixing an appropriate fee.

History

(Ga. L. 1887, p. 106, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 388; Civil Code 1910, § 477; Code 1933, § 23-407; Ga. L. 1956, p. 192, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 633, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 248, § 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1280, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 26 et seq.

36-3-27. Payment by county authorities of compensation; tax levy.

Statute text

It shall be the duty of the governing authorities of each of the counties affected by such survey to pay that proportion of the fee established under Code Section 36-3-26 that such county bears to the total number of counties directly affected by the survey. The payment of such fees is declared to be a public purpose. The governing authority of each county affected is authorized and directed to pay such fees and to levy such taxes as may be necessary for the payment of such fees.

History

(Ga. L. 1887, p. 106, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 389; Civil Code 1910, § 478; Code 1933, § 23-408; Ga. L. 1977, p. 248, § 5.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

When county not liable for surveyor's expenses. - When suit was brought by a surveyor, who was appointed by the Governor to run a disputed line between two counties under former Civil Code 1910, § 478 and former Civil Code 1910, § 473 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-3-27 and 36-3-22 et seq.), to recover from one of such counties one-half of the charge, there was no error in dismissing the suit on general demurrer (now motion to dismiss) because there was no valid law authorizing a county to levy taxes to meet such a claim, and a county is not liable for suit thereon. Robert v. Wilkinson County, 137 Ga. 601, 73 S.E. 838 (1912); Smith v. Baker County, 142 Ga. 168, 82 S.E. 557 (1914).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

O.C.G.A. § 36-3-27 requires that each governing authority pay each pro rata share of the survey fee and forbids contrary agreements. 1981 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 81-41.

——————————

CHAPTER 4

CHANGE OR REMOVAL OF COUNTY SITE

Sec.

36-4-1. Petition for removal or change of county site; order of election; notice of election; qualifications of voters; frequency of elections.

36-4-2. Conduct of election generally; returns.

36-4-3. Form and marking of ballots; number of votes required to authorize removal.

36-4-4. Certificate of Secretary of State as evidence of election and number of votes.

36-4-5. Where courts to be held after removal; validity of proceedings.

36-4-6. Where offices to be kept after removal.

Annotations

Cross references. - Limitation of number of counties, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. II.

36-4-1. Petition for removal or change of county site; order of election; notice of election; qualifications of voters; frequency of elections.

Statute text

Whenever two-fifths of the electors of any county who are qualified to vote for members of the General Assembly, as shown by the registration list last made out, shall petition the judge of the probate court for the removal or change of the county site of the county, the judge of the probate court shall at once grant an order directing an election to be held at the various election precincts in the county not less than 40 nor more than 60 days thereafter. The petition shall state where the new county site is to be located. Notice of the election shall be published weekly for four weeks previous to the day of the election in the newspaper in which the sheriff publishes his legal notices. All persons qualified to vote for members of the General Assembly shall be qualified to vote at the election. Elections under this Code section shall not occur more often than once in five years.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 44, § 1; Code 1882, § 508x; Ga. L. 1887, p. 39, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 391; Civil Code 1910, § 486; Ga. L. 1911, p. 54, § 1; Code 1933, § 23-501.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - Former Code 1895, § 391 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-4-1 et seq.) did not fall because of conflict with the Constitution as to the number of votes required to remove or change the county site. The sole purpose of these sections was to provide machinery to carry out the constitutional provision relative to a change of county sites by providing an election by striking out the requirements as to the number of votes, which was already fixed by the Constitution; these sections remain complete in themselves and capable of being carried out in accordance with the legislative intent. Lee v. Tucker, 130 Ga. 43, 60 S.E. 164 (1908) (decided prior to revision of section by Ga. L. 1911, p. 54, § 1).

General Assembly not bound by findings of Secretary of State. - General Assembly, in determining the facts and legislating upon the removal of county sites under former Civil Code 1910, § 486 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-4-1 et seq.), is not bound by the findings of the Secretary of State as to the result of the election. Bachlott v. Buie, 158 Ga. 705, 124 S.E. 339 (1924); Cowart v. Manry, 166 Ga. 612, 144 S.E. 21 (1928).

Failure of General Assembly to legislate. - When the removal election was held on May 5, 1927, and the General Assembly of 1927 did not pass any legislation thereon, the General Assembly of 1929 had the constitutional power and authority to pass an Act removing the county site. Cowart v. Manry, 166 Ga. 612, 144 S.E. 21 (1928).

Act for removal of county seat does not impair obligation of contract. - Act for the removal of the county seat does not impair the obligation of contract. In such matters one legislature had not the right to bind all subsequent legislatures. Hamrick v. Rouse, 17 Ga. 56 (1855).

Duty of ordinary (now judge of the probate court). - Under the provisions of this section, the power to call an election to determine whether in a given county there shall be a change of the location of the county site is vested in the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) and even if the General Assembly had power in a given case to so change this general law as to vest this power in another official, the Act approved December 8, 1886, creating a Board of Commissioners of Roads and Revenues for the County of DeKalb, neither vested nor sought to vest such power in the board of commissioners created by it. Wells v. Ragsdale, 102 Ga. 53, 29 S.E. 165 (1897).

If, in order to find that the petition contains the requisite two-fifths, it is necessary for the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) to act upon extraneous evidence, explaining that names on the petition and the digest list, though different, in fact refer to the same persons, and that certain names on the digest list are of deceased persons and persons removed from the county, then there is no absolute duty to call the election. After refusal by the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) mandamus will not lie to compel the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) to act. Barrett v. Ashmore, 137 Ga. 545, 73 S.E. 825 (1912).

Order shall not specify particular place of removal. - Petition for the election should be for an election for the removal of the county site, and the order calling the election should show that it is one for the removal of the actual county site, without specifying a particular place to which it shall be removed, so as to leave to the qualified voters free choice between the place where the county site is actually located and any other place in the county. Cheney v. Ragan, 151 Ga. 735, 108 S.E. 30 (1921).

Provision as to five-year period not binding on subsequent legislature. - Provision relating to the removal of a county seat not oftener than once every five years is not binding on a subsequent legislature and a subsequent legislature would be authorized under the Constitution to pass an Act removing a county site, although the election upon which the Act was based was held within less than five years from a previous election held for that purpose. Orr v. James, 159 Ga. 237, 125 S.E. 468 (1924).

Calling election prima-facie proof of proper petition. - Calling of the election by the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) determined at least prima facie that the petitioners were of the class and were of a sufficient number as required by the statute for the purpose of calling an election at which the question of the removal of the county site to a named town within the county should be voted upon. Vornberg v. Dunn, 143 Ga. 111, 84 S.E. 370 (1915).

Direction of the petition to "ordinary" (now judge of the probate court) instead of "court of ordinary" will not render the petition void. Vornberg v. Dunn, 143 Ga. 111, 84 S.E. 370 (1915).

Cited in Lee v. Tucker, 130 Ga. 43, 60 S.E. 164 (1908).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 90 et seq.

36-4-2. Conduct of election generally; returns.

Statute text

The election shall be held and conducted and returns shall be made thereof as is provided by Chapter 2 of Title 21, the "Georgia Election Code."

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 44, § 2; Code 1882, § 508y; Civil Code 1895, § 392; Civil Code 1910, § 487; Code 1933, § 23-502.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Where polls opened. - To the validity of an election it is not indispensable that the polls should be opened at each of the polling places in the county. Wells v. Ragsdale, 102 Ga. 53, 29 S.E. 165 (1897).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 31.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 97 et seq.

36-4-3. Form and marking of ballots; number of votes required to authorize removal.

Statute text

At the election, the form of the ballot and the procedure for marking the ballot shall be as provided in Chapter 2 of Title 21, the "Georgia Election Code." The ballot for such election shall have written or printed thereon the following:

"[ ] YES Shall the county site of __________ County

[ ] NO be moved to __________?"

In any such referendum election, all persons desiring to vote in favor of moving the county site shall vote "Yes," and those persons desiring to vote against moving the county site shall vote "No." If two-thirds of the votes cast at the election are in favor of removal, the General Assembly next convening after the election may provide for the removal of the county site by appropriate legislation.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 44, § 3; Code 1882, § 508z; Civil Code 1895, § 393; Civil Code 1910, § 488; Code 1933, § 23-503; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

History of section. - The language of this Code section is derived in part from the decision in Wells v. Ragsdale, 102 Ga. 53, 29 S.E. 165 (1897).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Voter must designate place preferred. - It is necessary not only that the voter voting for the removal of the county site should state upon the ballot "for removal," but also that the voter should designate thereon the particular place to which the voter desires the county seat removed. Wells v. Ragsdale, 102 Ga. 53, 29 S.E. 165 (1897); Cheney v. Ragan, 151 Ga. 735, 108 S.E. 30 (1921).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 97 et seq.

36-4-4. Certificate of Secretary of State as evidence of election and number of votes.

Statute text

The certificate of the Secretary of State showing that the election was held and that two-thirds of the qualified voters voting at the election voted in favor of removal shall be sufficient evidence of the holding of the election and of the number of votes cast.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 44, § 4; Code 1882, § 508aa; Civil Code 1895, § 394; Civil Code 1910, § 489; Ga. L. 1911, p. 54, § 1; Code 1933, § 23-504.)

Annotations

History of section. - The language of this Code section is derived in part from the decision in Wells v. Ragsdale, 102 Ga. 53, 29 S.E. 165 (1897).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Legislature not confined to secretary's certificate. - Legislature is not precluded from ascertaining by other appropriate means the facts concerning the election and the number of votes cast. Cutcher v. Crawford, 105 Ga. 180, 31 S.E. 139 (1898); Lee v. Tucker, 130 Ga. 43, 60 S.E. 164 (1908); Bachlott v. Buie, 158 Ga. 705, 124 S.E. 339 (1924).

Act of General Assembly which removes a county site is not unconstitutional and void because it was passed contrary to finding of Secretary of State. Cutcher v. Crawford, 105 Ga. 180, 31 S.E. 139 (1898); Lee v. Tucker, 130 Ga. 43, 60 S.E. 164 (1908); Vornberg v. Dunn, 143 Ga. 111, 84 S.E. 370 (1915); Bachlott v. Buie, 158 Ga. 705, 124 S.E. 337 (1924).

Injunction when legislature has not considered result. - An injunction will issue restraining the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) from erecting a new courthouse at the site of the old one after an election has been had to change the site, if the legislature had not considered the result. Wells v. Ragsdale, 102 Ga. 53, 29 S.E. 165 (1897).

Copy of election returns not admissible in evidence. - Certified copy from the office of the Secretary of State of the consolidated return of an election held in a given county upon the question of removing the county site thereof is not admissible in evidence for the purpose of showing that the General Assembly, in acting upon a bill providing for such removal, did not have before the General Assembly legal evidence showing that such an election had been held and that two-thirds of the qualified voters thereat voted in favor of a removal of the county site to a particular place. Cutcher v. Crawford, 105 Ga. 180, 31 S.E. 139 (1898).

Admissions in pleadings binding. - An admission made in the pleadings that certain of the voters voting at such election voted in favor of the removal of the county site to a particular place, so long as the admission stands as part of the pleading, is binding upon the party making the admission. Wells v. Ragsdale, 102 Ga. 53, 29 S.E. 165 (1897).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 26 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 293.

36-4-5. Where courts to be held after removal; validity of proceedings.

Statute text

After a county site is removed as provided by law, all the courts which are required by law to be held at the county site of the county, by proper orders made by the judges of such courts at chambers or in regular session and entered on the minutes of the courts, shall continue to be held in the old buildings at the former county site until the new buildings at the county site are ready for occupancy. All the proceedings of any court so held shall be legal.

History

(Ga. L. 1905, p. 104, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 502; Code 1933, § 23-517.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Jackson v. State, 31 Ga. App. 188, 120 S.E. 129 (1923).

36-4-6. Where offices to be kept after removal.

Statute text

The authorities having charge of county affairs in any county for which the county site has been removed shall provide by an order entered on their minutes that the county officers of the county shall have and keep their offices in such buildings at either the old or new county site as, in the judgment of the county authorities, may be best, until the new buildings are ready for occupancy.

History

(Ga. L. 1905, p. 104, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 503; Code 1933, § 23-518.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

It is not proper for county tax commissioner to store tax records in the commissioner's home. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U75-75.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 76.

——————————

CHAPTER 5

ORGANIZATION OF COUNTY GOVERNMENT

Article 1

[Repealed].

36-5-1. [Reserved].

Article 2

County Governing Authorities.

36-5-20. Official names of county governing authorities.

36-5-21. Vacancy in office of county commissioner or other governing authority.

36-5-22. County manager authorized.

36-5-22.1. Powers and duties; delegation.

36-5-23. Salary of county commissioner in counties having population of not less than 56,400 or more than 60,000 [Repealed].

36-5-24. Definitions; compensation of members of county governing authorities.

36-5-25. Salary of county commissioner in county administered by single commissioner.

36-5-26. Authorization for service of process.

36-5-27. Compensation supplement with designation as a certified county commissioner.

36-5-28. Members of county governing authority to receive compensation increase when classified service employees receive increase; calculation; effective date.

36-5-29. Pay increases for certain members of county governing authorities.

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey article on local government law, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (1998).

——————————

ARTICLE 1

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1987, p. 1482, § 5, effective April 17, 1987, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article. The former article, which was entitled "Government by Judge of the Probate Court," consisted of Code Sections 36-5-1 through 36-5-8 and was based on Orig. Code 1863, §§ 286, 287, 4028 through 4031, 4034; Code 1868, §§ 346, 347, 4058 through 4061, 4064; Code 1873, §§ 337, 338, 4123 through 4126, 4129; Ga. L. 1877, p. 109, § 1; Code 1882, §§ 337, 338, 741a, 4123 through 4126, 4129; Civil Code 1895, §§ 4238 through 4240, 4263 through 4266, 4268; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4796 through 4798, 4821 through 4824, 4826; Code 1933, §§ 23-701 through 23-708; Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; and Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.

36-5-1.

Statute text

Reserved.

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, the designation of this Code section was reserved.

——————————

ARTICLE 2

COUNTY GOVERNING AUTHORITIES

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in McCracken v. Gainesville Tribune, Inc., 146 Ga. App. 274, 246 S.E.2d 360 (1978).

36-5-20. Official names of county governing authorities.

Statute text

The words "Roads and Revenues" are stricken from the official names of all of the governing authorities of the counties of this state, so that the official names of the governing authorities of the counties will be changed from "Board of Commissioners of Roads and Revenues of ____________ County" and from the "Commissioner of Roads and Revenue of ______________ County" to "Board of Commissioners of ______________ County" and "Commissioner of ______________ County," respectively.

History

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 1141, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Cross references. - "County governing authority" defined, § 1-3-3(7).

36-5-21. Vacancy in office of county commissioner or other governing authority.

Statute text

(a) When a vacancy occurs in the office of a county governing authority in any county in which the local Act creating that governing authority for the county makes no provision for succession to fill the vacancy and the unexpired term of office exceeds six months in duration, it shall be the duty of the judge of the probate court of the county to call a special election to elect a successor and fill the vacancy in not less than 30 nor more than 60 days. The election shall be held as provided by Chapter 2 of Title 21, the "Georgia Election Code," and the cost of the election shall be defrayed by the proper county authorities. If the unexpired term to be filled is less than six months in duration and the local Act creating the governing authority makes no provision to fill the vacancy, the judge of the superior court of the county shall have the power to appoint a successor to fill the unexpired term.

(b) Unless otherwise provided by local law, when the office of any county commissioner is vacated for any reason and a special election is required to be called pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the remaining members of the board of commissioners shall constitute the governing authority of the county during the interim period between the creation of the vacancy and the election and qualification of a successor to fill the vacancy pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, except that if as a result of that vacancy or any combination of such vacancies there is no longer any commissioner remaining in office to constitute the county governing authority, the judge of the probate court of the county shall serve as the county governing authority until the election and qualification under subsection (a) of this Code section of all successors to the vacated positions on the county governing authority.

(c) A judge of the probate court serving as the county governing authority pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall receive for such service, in addition to any other compensation that judge is authorized by law to receive, an amount equal to the amount the chairman of the board of commissioners or the sole commissioner, as applicable, would have been authorized to receive for that period of service.

History
